Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-1406. Classification of positions.

(1)There are established for the institutions of higher education covered by this subchapter the classification titles and grades.

No payment of salaries may be made except in conformity with the maximum annual salary rates assigned to the grades established by this section for each year as provided in the appropriation act of the institution and in this subchapter.

The following classification titles with their assigned grades are approved for the classification and compensation plan under this subchapter, subject to the appropriation acts for the institutions:

Class Code Title Grade D007C
INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER
C128
B015C
ENGINEER SUPERVISOR C126 D016C
SENIOR TECHNOLOGY ANALYST
C126 D114C
UAF SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR C126 D020C INST INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY COORD
C125 E009C TECHNICAL INSTITUTE ASSISTANT DIRECTOR C125 A031C
ASSISTANT CONTROLLER C124 D035C
COMPUTER SUPPORT MANAGER
C124 D034C
DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR
C124 E013C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER
C124 D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR
C124 D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST C124 D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST C124 A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER C123 D039C NETWORK SUPPORT SPECIALIST C123 P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER C123 D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST
C123 G103C ASSOCIATE REGISTRAR
C122 T019C DIRECTOR OF PUBLIC SAFETY I
C122 T018C HE PUBLIC SAFETY COMMANDER III C122 D047C INFORMATION SYSTEMS BUSINESS ANALYST C122 D050C SECURITY ANALYST C122 E018C SPECIALIZED TECHNICAL FACULTY C122 D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST C122 B033C UAF CONSTRUCTION COORDINATOR C122 A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR C121 D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR C121 E022C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION MANAGER C121 A047C
FINANCIAL ANALYST II
C121 G109C GRANTS MANAGER C121 T023C HE PUBLIC SAFETY COMMANDER II
C121 S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER C121 L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR C121 R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER C121 V004C PROCUREMENT MANAGER C121 D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST C121 D051C SYSTEMS APPLICATIONS SUPERVISOR C121 P008C TELEVISION PROGRAM MANAGER C121 D060C ASST DIR COMPUTER SVCS C120 S006C ASU ASSOC DIR PHYSICAL PLANT C120 B056C ASU CONSTRUCTION COORDINATOR C120 G136C ASU DIRECTOR OF HOUSING C120 D059C ASU ENGINEERING COMM FACILITIES DIR C120 B054C CAMPUS CONSTRUCTION COORDINATOR C120 E027C CAREER & TECHNICAL FACULTY C120 D058C COMPUTER OPERATIONS COORDINATOR C120 E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COOR- DINATOR C120 D057C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGER C120 Q078C PC SUPPORT SPECIALIST C120 P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR C120 T030C PUBLIC SAFETY COMMANDER I C120 L038C REGISTERED NURSE C120 D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST C120 G118C UAF ASSOC DIR OF AR UNION C120 A053C UAF ASST BUSINESS MANAGER C120 P011C UAF SPORTS INFORMATION COOR- DINATOR C120 B064C ASU DIRECTOR OF FARMING C119 R022C BENEFITS COORDINATOR C119 R021C BUDGET ANALYST C119 V008C BUYER SUPERVISOR C119 S008C CAMPUS MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR C119 D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST C119 P016C CURATOR C119 D062C DATABASE ANALYST C119 G159C DEPARTMENT BUSINESS COORDINATOR C119 P065C DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST C119 E032C EDUCATION COUNSELOR C119 E031C EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR C119 G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR C119 D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATION SPEC C119 A066C INTERNAL AUDITOR C119 A065C PAYROLL SERVICES COORDINATOR C119 V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR C119 B061C RESEARCH TECHNOLOGIST C119 G144C TECHNICAL INSTITUTE PROGRAM COOR- DINATOR C119 R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER C118 S012C ASU ASST DIRECTOR OF PHYSICAL PLANT C118 G172C
CAREER PLANNING & PLAC COOR- DINATOR C118 M030C CHILD CARE DIRECTOR C118 D066C DIGITAL BROADCAST SPECIALIST
C118 G169C DIRECTOR OF STUDENT UNION C118 E038C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION ANALYST C118 C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR C118 A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I
C118 A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR C118 R023C INSTITUTION PERSONNEL SVCS MANAGER C118 L047C MEDICAL TECHNOLOGIST SUPERVISOR C118 D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST C118 A072C RESEARCH & STATISTICS MANAGER C118 M022C UAPB DIRECTOR OF HOUSING C118 D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER C118 A082C ACCOUNTANT II
C117 G190C ASST DIR FINANCIAL AID C117 G189C ATU DIRECTOR OF HOUSING C117 S020C AVIATION TECHNICIAN C117 P023C BROADCAST PROMOTION SPECIALIST C117 R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST C117 C019C CLINIC BUSINESS SVCS MANAGER C117 D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST
C117 P022C COORDINATOR OF SPORTS INFORMATION C117 L055C DIETICIAN C117 P021C EDITOR C117 G180C GRANTS ANALYST C117 R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST C117 D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST C117 D067C INFORMATION SYSTEMS SECURITY ANALYST C117 G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST C117 S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR C117 V011C MEDICAL BUYER C117 P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST C117 M038C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY ANALYST C117 T051C PUBLIC SAFETY SUPERVISOR C117 B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST C117 S016C SKILLED TRADES FOREMAN C117 E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR C117 M035C UALR DIRECTOR OF HOUSING C117 M034C UAM DIRECTOR OF HOUSING C117 M033C UCA ASSISTANT DIRECTOR OF HOUSING C117 A089C ACCOUNTANT I
C116 B072C AGRICULTURE PROGRAM COORDINATOR C116 B091C ASSISTANT DIRECTOR OF FARMING C116 C023C ASSOCIATE BOOKSTORE MANAGER C116 B089C ASU ASST DIRECTOR OF FARMING C116 S029C ASU DIRECTOR OF HOUSEKEEPING C116 A087C
ASU PAYROLL SERVICES MANAGER C116 S092C ATHLETIC TICKET SALES COORDINATOR C116 S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS COORDINATOR C116 C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST C116 V014C BUYER C116 X129C CONSTRUCTION INSPECTOR
C116 S024C CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD
C116 P032C DESIGN CONSULTANT C116 G197C DIRECTOR OF ALUMNI C116 E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST C116 R030C EEO/GRIEVANCE OFFICER
C116 B087C ENERGY CONSERVATION COORD
C116 B090C ENGINEER TECHNICIAN C116 G195C HIGHER ED INSTITUTION PROG COORD C116 R029C HUMAN RESOURCES RECRUITER C116 P031C MEDIA SPECIALIST C116 P030C MUSEUM EXHIBIT PROGRAM SPECIALIST C116 X119C OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY COORDINATOR C116 S023C PRINT SHOP MANAGER C116 P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST C116 T055C PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER C116 P066C RADIO NEWS DIRECTOR C116 P026C RADIO PROGRAM DIRECTOR C116 S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR C116 D075C SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST C116 C020C STUDENT APPLICATIONS SPECIALIST
C116 D074C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SUPERVISOR C116 E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR C116 C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST
C115 Q123C ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT C115 G212C ASST DIR STUDENT UNION
C115 C035C ASST REGISTRAR C115 G211C ASU ASST DIRECTOR OF HOUSING C115 R033C BENEFITS ANALYST C115 C034C BOOKSTORE MANAGER C115 C033C CLINIC BUSINESS SVCS SUPERVISOR C115 D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN C115 S097C CONSTRUCTION SPECIALIST C115 S035C FABRICATION SHOP MANAGER C115 G207C FINANCIAL AID ANALYST C115 A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST C115 D077C HELP DESK SPECIALIST C115 R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE C115 R031C INSTITUTION HUMAN RESOURCES COORDINATOR C115 E050C LIBRARY SUPERVISOR C115 S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR C115 C028C MEDICAL RECORDS SUPERVISOR C115 L061C MEDICAL TECHNOLOGIST C115 A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST C115 S032C PRINT SHOP SUPERVISOR C115 V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST C115 M055C SAU DIRECTOR OF HOUSEKEEPING C115 S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN C115 P033C SPECIAL EVENTS MANAGER C115 C025C STUDENT ACCOUNTS OFFICER C115 S038C TRANSIT OPERATIONS SUPERVISOR C115 B100C ARCHITECTURAL DRAFTSMAN C114 P043C ARCHIVAL ASSISTANT C114 S042C ATU COLISEUM MANAGER C114 S041C BOILER OPERATOR C114 P042C BROADCAST PRODUCTION SPECIALIST C114 G215C CAREER PLANNING & PLACEMENT SPECIALIST
C114 P041C
COMMERCIAL GRAPHIC ARTIST
C114 D084C
COMPUTER OPERATOR
C114 S044C FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER C114 G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST C114 P039C INSTITUTIONAL PRINTER C114 D082C NETWORK ANALYST C114 M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST C114 T067C PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER II C114 L064C RADIOLOGY TECHNICIAN C114 X151C SAFETY SUPERVISOR C114 E051C STAFF DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST C114 S099C STATIONARY ENGINEER C114 A093C STATISTICIAN C114 M062C STUDENT UNION NIGHT MANAGER C114 D081C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST C114 V018C WAREHOUSE MANAGER C114 C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR C113 S048C ASST RESTAURANT MANAGER
C113 E053C AUDIOVISUAL AIDS SUPV C113 A096C COLLECTION OFFICER C113 P049C COMMERCIAL ARTIST I/GRAPHIC ART I C113 P084C MULTIMEDIA SPECIALIST C113 C051C FINANCIAL AID SPECIALIST C113 R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST C113 V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER C113 S047C LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR C113 C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST C113 L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE C113 S049C LODGE HOUSEKEEPING SUPERVISOR C113 G219C LOGISTICS MANAGER C113 S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN C113 C044C MEDICAL BILLING SPECIALIST C113 L068C
MEDICAL DIAGNOSTIC ANALYST C113 P048C MULTI-MEDIA SPECIALIST C113 P047C
MUSEUM REGISTRAR
C113 R035C PERSONNEL ASSISTANT II — INST C113 P046C PHOTOGRAPHER C113 S045C
PRINTING ESTIMATOR/PLANNER C113 P045C PUBLIC INFORMATION TECHNICIAN C113 C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST C113 T072C SECURITY OFFICER SUPERVISOR C113 G218C STUDENT RECRUITMENT SPECIALIST C113 C057C ADMINISTRATION SUPPORT SPECIALIST C112 C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III C112 C055C ASSISTANT BOOKSTORE MANAGER C112 S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC C112 A099C CREDIT & COLLECTIONS SUPV C112 E055C DAY CARE TEACHER C112 T080C DIRECTOR TRANSIT & PARKING C112 B105C FARM FOREMAN — INST C112 A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST C112 S051C INSTRUMENTATION TECHNICIAN C112 S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST C112 C053C MEDICAL RECORDS TECHNICIAN C112 A097C PAYROLL TECHNICIAN C112 V022C PURCHASING TECHNICIAN C112 M072C RECREATION COORDINATOR C112 B106C RESEARCH ASSISTANT C112 P053C SPECIAL EVENTS COORDINATOR C112 P052C SPORTS INFORMATION SPECIALIST C112 P051C THEATER ARTS TECHNICAL SUPERVISOR C112 C060C ALUMNI AFFAIRS SPECIALIST C111 S055C ATHLETIC FACILITY SUPV C111 M077C COORDINATOR OF HOUSEKEEPING C111 S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR C111 D089C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ASSISTANT C111 B108C LABORATORY COORDINATOR C111 E058C LIBRARY SPECIALIST C111 X177C PEST CONTROL TECHNICIAN C111 S054C PRINTER C111 M075C RESIDENT HALL SPECIALIST C111 M074C RESIDENTIAL ADVISOR C111 V023C STOREROOM SUPERVISOR C111 C065C ADMISSIONS ANALYST SUPERVISOR C110 L092C ATHLETIC TRAINER C110 C064C BOOKSTORE OFFICE MANAGER C110 D092C CALL CENTER SPECIALIST C110 C063C CAMPUS POSTMASTER C110 X181C COLLECTOR C110 D091C COMPUTER LAB TECHNICIAN C110 S058C EQUIPMENT MECHANIC C110 B120C FARM MAINTENANCE MECHANIC C110 L077C HEALTH SERVICES SPECIALIST II C110 L076C HOSPITAL PROGRAM SERVICES ASSISTANT C110 R038C
HUMAN RESOURCES ASSISTANT C110 B111C LABORATORY TECHNICIAN C110 S057C LANDSCAPE SPECIALIST C110 P057C LIVESTOCK NEWS REPORTER C110 A100C PAYROLL OFFICER C110 T084C PUBLIC SAFETY SECURITY OFFICER C110 P055C SPECIAL EVENTS SUPERVISOR C110 C061C STUDENT ACCOUNT SPECIALIST C110 G221C VEHICLE FACILITIES COORD C110 V025C WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST C110 A101C ACCOUNTING TECHNICIAN C110 C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II C109 C072C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SPECIALIST C109 C071C ADMISSIONS ANALYST C109 P059C
BROADCAST ANNOUNCER C109 L082C CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT C109 L080C
DIETETIC TECHNICIAN C109 C070C DUPLICATION ASSISTANT C109 B112C GREENHOUSE TECHNICIAN C109 S060C HEAVY EQUIPMENT OPERATOR C109 L079C HOSPITAL TECHNICIAN C109 S063C INNKEEPER SPECIALIST C109 S062C
INSTITUTIONAL BUS DRIVER C109 C069C LIBRARY TECHNICIAN C109 C066C PATIENT ACCOUNT SPECIALIST C109 B113C RESEARCH TECHNICIAN
C109 C068C RETAIL SPECIALIST C109 M080C STUDENT UNION SECTION MANAGER C109 M079C WORK STUDY COORD C109 C079C ADMISSIONS SPECIALIST C108 C078C CASHIER C108 C077C COOP EXTENSION SRV PRG ASST C108 A102C FISCAL SUPPORT TECHNICIAN C108 S068C FOOD PREPARATION COORDINATOR C108 V027C INVENTORY CONTROL TECHNICIAN C108 S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT C108 C074C
MEDICAL RECORDS ASSISTANT C108 P060C MULTI-MEDIA TECHNICIAN C108 S064C
SKILLED TRADES HELPER C108 S073C HOUSEKEEPER C107 S071C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES SHIFT SUPVT C107 C085C LIBRARY SUPPORT ASSISTANT C107 C083C MAIL SERVICES COORDINATOR C107 S069C RADIO DISPATCH OPERATOR C107 C082C REGISTRAR'S ASSISTANT C107 S074C RESIDENT HALL MANAGER I C107 C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I C106 B115C AGRI FARM TECHNICIAN C106 B116C AGRI LABORATORY TECHNICIAN C106 S075C ATHLETIC EQUIPMENT SUPV C106 E057C AUDIOVISUAL LABORATORY ASSISTANT C106 T089C HE PUBLIC SAFETY DISPATCHER C106 T088C PARKING CONTROL SUPV
C106 V029C PURCHASING ASSISTANT C106 M089C
RESIDENTIAL CARE ASSISTANT C106 T087C SECURITY OFFICER C106 P063C
SPECIAL EVENTS WORKER C106 V028C WAREHOUSE WORKER C106 B117C ACADEMIC LABORATORY ASSISTANT C105 S081C APPRENTICE TRADESMAN C105 M086C CHILD CARE TECHNICIAN C105 S080C EQUIPMENT OPERATOR C105 C088C MAIL SERVICES ASSISTANT C105 T090C PARKING CONTROL OFFICER C105 S079C REPROD EQUIPMENT OPERATOR C105 V030C SHIPPING & RECEIVING CLERK C105 S078C STADIUM MAINTENANCE SUPV C105 M085C CAREGIVER C104 S086C COOK C104 B118C FARM WORKER C104 S085C FOOD PREPARATION SPECIALIST C104 S084C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR C104 S087C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ASSISTANT C103 B119C LAB ASSISTANT C103 S089C FOOD PREPARATION TECHNICIAN C102 C093C EXTRA HELP ASSISTANT C101 T091C
WATCHMAN C101

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 2.

21-5-1407. Compensation plan.

There is established for institutions of higher education covered by this subchapter a compensation plan for the setting of salaries and salary increases, when deserved, of all employees serving in positions covered by this subchapter.

(1)No employee shall be paid at a rate of pay higher than the appropriate rate in the grade assigned to his or her class, and no employee shall be paid more than the highest pay level established for the employee's grade unless otherwise provided for in this subchapter.

However, an employee presently employed in a position who is being paid at a rate in excess of the maximum for his or her assigned grade may continue to receive his or her rate of pay.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to authorize, in the enactment of the compensation plans, rates of pay for each of the appropriate grades assigned to a class, but it is not the intent of the General Assembly that any pay increases be automatic or that any employee have a claim or a right to pay increases unless the head of the institution determines that the employee, by experience, ability, and work performance, is eligible for the increase in pay authorized for the grade assigned by classification to the employee's position.

Pay levels established in this subchapter are for compensation management purposes and are not to be construed as a contract, right, or other expectation of actual employee salary determination.

Grade Minimum 15% Above Minimum Midpoint 30% Above Minimum Maximum C101
$20,800 $23,920
$26,520 $27,040 $32,240 C102
$21,127 $24,295 $27,328 $27,464 $33,530 C103
$21,453 $24,671 $28,162 $27,889 $34,871 C104
$21,780 $25,046 $29,023 $28,313 $36,266 C105
$22,106 $25,422 $29,911 $28,738 $37,716 C106
$22,433 $25,797 $30,829 $29,162 $39,225 C107
$22,759 $26,173 $31,776 $29,587 $40,794 C108
$23,086 $26,548 $32,756 $30,011 $42,426 C109
$23,412 $26,924 $33,767 $30,436 $44,123 C110
$23,739 $27,299 $34,813 $30,860 $45,888 C111 $24,065 $27,675 $35,894 $31,285 $47,723 C112
$25,268 $29,058 $37,450 $32,848 $49,632 C113
$26,531 $30,511 $39,074 $34,490 $51,617 C114
$27,858 $32,037 $40,770 $36,215 $53,682 C115
$29,251 $33,639 $42,540 $38,026 $55,829 C116
$30,713 $35,320 $44,388 $39,927 $58,062 C117
$32,249 $37,086 $46,317 $41,924 $60,385 C118
$33,861 $38,940 $48,331 $44,019 $62,800 C119 $35,554 $40,887 $50,433 $46,220 $65,312 C120
$37,332 $42,932 $52,628 $48,532 $67,925 C121
$39,199 $45,079 $54,920 $50,959 $70,642 C122
$41,159 $47,333 $57,313 $53,507 $73,467 C123
$43,217 $49,700 $59,812 $56,182 $76,406 C124
$45,377 $52,184 $62,420 $58,990 $79,462 C125
$47,646 $54,793 $65,143 $61,940 $82,641 C126
$50,029 $57,533 $67,988 $65,038 $85,947 C127
$52,530 $60,410 $70,957 $68,289 $89,384 C128
$55,156 $63,429 $74,058 $71,703 $92,960 C129
$57,914 $66,601 $77,296 $75,288 $96,678 C130 $60,810 $69,932 $80,678 $79,053 $100,545

Click to view table.

GRADE BASE MIDPOINT MAXIMUM N901
$65,000
$73,125
$81,250 N902
$67,600 $76,050
$84,500 N903
$70,304
$79,092
$87,880 N904
$73,116 $82,256
$91,395 N905
$76,041
$85,546
$95,051 N906
$79,082 $88,968
$98,853 N907
$82,246
$92,526
$102,807 N908
$85,536
$96,228
$106,919 N909
$88,957
$100,077
$111,196
N910
$92,515
$104,080
$115,644 N911
$96,216
$108,243
$120,270 N912
$100,065
$112,573
$125,081 N913
$104,067
$117,075
$130,084 N914
$108,230
$121,759
$135,287 N915
$112,559 $126,629 $140,699 N916
$117,061
$131,694
$146,327 N917
$122,914
$138,279
$153,643 N918
$130,289
$146,575
$162,862 N919
$139,410
$156,836
$174,262 N920
$150,562
$169,383
$188,203 N921
$164,113
$184,627
$205,141
N922
$180,524
$203,090
$225,655

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, §§ 3, 4.

21-5-1408. Implementation of plan — Changes in class specifications.

For the purposes of implementing the higher education uniform classification and compensation plan for the institutions of higher education covered by this subchapter, the General Assembly determines that the class specifications prepared by the Division of Higher Education in classifying the positions authorized in the appropriation act of each institution be the class specifications to be followed in implementing the respective appropriations for all part-time and full-time employees of the institutions covered by this subchapter.

Changes in class specifications may be made, in whole or in part, by rule of the division, and the changes shall be reported on a quarterly basis to the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4.

21-5-1409. Implementation procedure for grade changes — Salary adjustments.

The Division of Higher Education has administrative responsibility for enforcing compliance by institutions of higher education affected by this subchapter in implementing classification and grade changes.

(1)The rate of compensation an employee shall receive on July 1, 2019, is an increase of one percent (1%) above the employee's current salary.

An employee whose adjusted annual salary falls below the entry pay level for the grade assigned to his or her classification shall be further adjusted to the entry pay level.

The salary increase authorized by subdivision (b)(1) of this section may allow an employee's compensation to exceed the maximum pay level amount set out for the position.

(1)In addition to the compensation increase under subsection (b) of this section, the maximum annual salary for which an employee covered by this subchapter is eligible on July 1, 2019, may be increased:

By a percentage up to two percent (2%) with written approval by the Director of the Division of Higher Education; or

More than two percent (2%) only with written approval of the director after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The salary increase may be established as an increase to the employee's salary or as a lump sum.

An employee compensated at the highest pay level rate authorized for his or her classification is eligible to receive the salary increase authorized in this section as a lump sum payment.

Salary adjustments made by the director under this section shall be reported to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

All percentage calculations stipulated in this subchapter or any other law affecting salaries of employees of institutions of higher education may be rounded to the nearest even-dollar amount by the division when making the increases to employee salaries as provided under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2324-2326.

21-5-1410. New appointments — Other compensation plan provisions.

A new appointment to a position in an institution of higher education covered by this subchapter shall be paid at the minimum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification unless otherwise authorized by law.

Special rates of pay may be established for either classifications or positions for the following reasons:

(1)An institution may request a special rate of pay for a specific classification or position due to prevailing market rates of pay up to the midpoint pay level of the appropriate grade of a classification on the appropriate pay table for the assigned grade with the written approval of the Director of the Division of Higher Education.

An institution may request a special rate of pay for a specific classification or position due to prevailing market rates of pay up to the maximum pay level for the assigned grade only with the approval of the director after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The Division of Higher Education shall maintain a register of classifications or positions for which special rates of pay have been established due to prevailing market rates of pay.

The division shall file a report of special rates of pay established due to prevailing market rates of pay with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next regularly scheduled meeting following the approval.

(1)A special rate of pay may be established for an exceptionally well-qualified applicant whose educational background or experience qualifies the applicant to perform the job with little or substantially less orientation and training than would be required for another qualified applicant.

(A)The head of the institution may approve a special rate of pay under subdivision (d)(1) of this section up to fifteen percent (15%) above the minimum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification and shall report all actions under the division's procedures.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 6; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2327-2331.

21-5-1411. Shift differential.

(1)Upon the approval of the Division of Higher Education, an employee whose working hours do not conform to normal state business hours shall be eligible for additional compensation up to twelve percent (12%) of the hourly rate for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter as a shift differential if:

Designated weekend hours begin no earlier than 2:30 p.m. on Friday and end no later than 8:00 a.m. on the following Monday.

If shift and weekend differentials are provided to an employee, the total compensation may exceed the highest pay level for the grade for those positions included in this subchapter.

(A)The institution shall identify the shifts, job classifications, and positions to be eligible for the shift differential and the differential percentage for which each classification is eligible within each shift.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2332-2334.

21-5-1412. Compensation differentials.

Attainment of additional education is from an accredited institution of higher education, documented by official transcript, certificate, or degree award, and directly related to the predominant purpose and use of the position or classification; and

The education to be compensated is not included as a special requirement or minimum qualification established for the classification by the official class specification.

An employee who receives additional compensation under this subsection and who moves into a position that does not need the skill to communicate in a language other than English shall revert on the effective date of the change to the rate of pay that the employee would otherwise receive.

An on-call duty or standby-duty differential is to be used for officially scheduled duty outside regular work hours during which time an employee is required to be accessible by telephone, pager, or other means and is required to return to the designated work site upon notification of need within a specified response time.

(A)An employee who is required to be available for duty on nights, weekends, or holidays or at other times or in other situations when the institution does not have regularly scheduled staff coverage is eligible to receive an on-call or standby-duty pay equivalent of an hourly rate not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of his or her base hourly pay rate for each on-call or standby hour for not more than forty-eight (48) hours during any seven-day work period.

Approval by the director; and

Review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 7; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2335, 2336.

21-5-1413. Salary administration grids.

The hiring of a new employee under this section shall not affect the salary, grade, or classification of any current employee within the institution.

The division shall promulgate rules regarding the implementation and use of a salary administration grid with the review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 8; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2337-2340.

21-5-1414. Extra help positions.

The rates of pay for extra help employees shall be set in accordance with and shall not exceed those provided in this subchapter for the appropriate classification.

Extra help employees of institutions shall not exceed one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours per fiscal year as set out in §6-63-314.

The classification has an established current labor market special entry pay level;

The position is approved for shift differential in accordance with this subchapter; or

The employee's eligibility is based on prior state service in a regular position.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 9.

21-5-1415. Position pools.

Central pool positions shall be used by the institution if the personnel service needs exceed the number of positions authorized by the General Assembly and were not anticipated at the time of the passage of the institution's operating appropriation act.

An institution shall use temporary transition pool positions only if the personnel service needs exceed the number of positions in a classification authorized by the General Assembly and were not anticipated at the time of the passage of the institution's operating appropriation bill.

A position established under this section shall be approved for the same classification as the position occupied by the transitioning full-time employee.

A position from the temporary transition pool shall not be authorized for an institution until the specific position is:

A pool position received by an institution under this section is subject to the institution's ability to certify funding.

A position established under this section shall not exceed a salary rate of the highest maximum annual salary rate or the highest grade level position authorized by the General Assembly in the requesting institution's appropriation act.

The institution shall provide justification to the division for the need to allocate positions from the central pool or temporary transition pool.

Titles shall not be assigned to the institution from the central pool or temporary transition pool until specific positions are:

Requested by the institution;

Recommended by the division; and

Reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

If an institution requests any central pool position to be continued during the subsequent fiscal year, the position shall be requested as a new position in the institution's subsequent fiscal year budget request.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 10; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2341, 2342.

21-5-1416. Annual career service recognition payments for employees of institutions of higher education.

(1)(A)Nonfaculty and classified employees of institutions of higher education shall become eligible for annual career service recognition payments upon completion of ten (10) or more years of service in either elected positions or classified or nonclassified positions with a state agency or an institution.

STATE SERVICE ANNUAL PAYMENT 10 through 14 years of state service
$
800
15 through 19 years of state service
1,000 20 through 24 years of state service
1,200 25 or more years of state service
1,500

Click to view table.

Subject to withholding of all applicable state and federal taxes; and

Included by retirement systems in determining benefits.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 910, § 2343; 2019, No. 914, § 2.

21-5-1417. Merit increase pay system — Definition.

(A)Employees are eligible for a merit increase to be paid as an increase in salary or a lump sum on the employee's merit increase date, and the payment shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum pay level for the grade.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 763, § 11; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2344-2345.

21-5-1418. Information technology labor market rates for recruitment and retention.

The division shall establish the list of applicable information technology classifications after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Division; and

Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 763, § 12.

21-5-106. Annual career service recognition payments for state employees.

21-5-213. [Repealed.]

21-5-216. [Repealed.]

21-5-218. Reimbursement for interpreter services for deaf.

Subchapter 4

— State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board

21-5-414. State contributions generally — Partial state contribution of employees' premiums.

21-5-1004 — 21-5-1006. [Repealed.]